sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
PFX A 0 isvombotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvombou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvombova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvombowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvombozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvomu/C . 
PFX A 0 isvomu/D . 
PFX A 0 isvomu/F . 
PFX A 0 isvondi/C . 
PFX A 0 isvondi/D . 
PFX A 0 isvondi/F . 
PFX A 0 isvondo/C . 
PFX A 0 isvondo/D . 
PFX A 0 isvondo/F . 
PFX A 0 isvondoa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondoi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondoka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondomu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondoru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondoti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvondozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongo/C . 
PFX A 0 isvongo/D . 
PFX A 0 isvongo/F . 
PFX A 0 isvongoa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongoi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongoka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongomu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongoru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongoti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 isvonguno/D . 
PFX A 0 isvonguno/F . 
PFX A 0 isvongunoa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunoi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunoka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunomu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunoru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunoti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvongunozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvono/C . 
PFX A 0 isvono/D . 
PFX A 0 isvono/F . 
PFX A 0 isvonoa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonoi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonoka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonomu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonoru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonoti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyo/C . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyo/F . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyoa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyoi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyoka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyomu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyoru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyoti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyanyozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatso/F . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsoa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsoi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsoka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsomu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsoru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsoti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvonyatsozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvopa/C . 
PFX A 0 isvopa/D . 
PFX A 0 isvopa/F . 
PFX A 0 isvori/C . 
PFX A 0 isvori/D . 
PFX A 0 isvori/F . 
PFX A 0 isvoru/C . 
PFX A 0 isvoru/D . 
PFX A 0 isvoru/F . 
PFX A 0 isvorwu/C . 
PFX A 0 isvorwu/D . 
PFX A 0 isvorwu/F . 
PFX A 0 isvosi/C . 
PFX A 0 isvosi/D . 
PFX A 0 isvosi/F . 
PFX A 0 isvosia/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosichi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosidzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosihu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosihwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosii/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosika/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosikwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosimu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosindi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosiri/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosiru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosirwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvositi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvositu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvositwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosiu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosiva/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosiwa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosizvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikiro/F . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikiroa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikiroi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikiroka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikiromu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikiroru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikiroti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikirozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 isvosviko/D . 
PFX A 0 isvosviko/F . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikoa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikoi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikoka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikomu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikoru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikoti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosvikozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswero/C . 
PFX A 0 isvoswero/D . 
PFX A 0 isvoswero/F . 
PFX A 0 isvosweroa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosweroi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosweroka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosweromu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosweroru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvosweroti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoswerozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvoti/C . 
PFX A 0 isvoti/D . 
PFX A 0 isvoti/F . 
PFX A 0 isvoto/C . 
PFX A 0 isvoto/D . 
PFX A 0 isvoto/F . 
PFX A 0 isvotoa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotoi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotoka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotomu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotoru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvototi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvototu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvototwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvotu/C . 
PFX A 0 isvotu/D . 
PFX A 0 isvotu/F . 
PFX A 0 isvotwu/C . 
PFX A 0 isvotwu/D . 
PFX A 0 isvotwu/F . 
PFX A 0 isvou/C . 
PFX A 0 isvou/D . 
PFX A 0 isvou/F . 
PFX A 0 isvova/C . 
PFX A 0 isvova/D . 
PFX A 0 isvova/F . 
PFX A 0 isvowa/C . 
PFX A 0 isvowa/D . 
PFX A 0 isvowa/F . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzo/F . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzoa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzochi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzohu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzoi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzoka/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzomu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzondi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzori/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzoru/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzoti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzotu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzou/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzova/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzowa/H . 
PFX A 0 isvowanzozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozai/C . 
PFX A 0 isvozai/D . 
PFX A 0 isvozai/F . 
PFX A 0 isvozaia/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaichi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaidzi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaihu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaihwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaii/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaika/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaikwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaimu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaindi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozairi/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozairu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozairwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaiti/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaitu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaitwu/H . 
PFX A 0 isvozaiu/H . 
