sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
ara/AVQ
bamba/AVQ
banzura/AVQ
batsidza/AVQ
beka/AVQ
beuka/AVQ
bhagamura/AVQ
bhebha/AVQ
bheuka/AVQ
bhodora/AVQ
bhubhudyura/AVQ
bhurisa/AVQ
bidiridza/AVQ
bingunura/AVQ
bisisa/AVQ
bokora/AVQ
bongora/AVQ
bovesa/AVQ
budisa/AVQ
bumbuzira/AVQ
buridza/AVQ
bva/AVQ
bvanzaura/AVQ
bvengedza/AVQ
bvisira/AVQ
bvonyera/AVQ
bvubvumira/AVQ
bvukutira/AVQ
bvundira/AVQ
bvura-bvura/AVQ
bvuvisa/AVQ
bwatama/AVQ
bwerebwetesa/AVQ
bwingura/AVQ
chabudzira/AVQ
chacharika/AVQ
chakaira/AVQ
chanyangura/AVQ
chatadzisa/AVQ
chechepfudza/AVQ
chekeche/AVQ
chena/AVQ
chenuka/AVQ
cherechedza/AVQ
cheya/AVQ
chin'a/AVQ
chinyura/AVQ
chochodza/AVQ
chonjomarisa/AVQ
chunjurusa/AVQ
dadanuka/AVQ
dakashura/AVQ
danyanga/AVQ
davidzira/AVQ
dekadza/AVQ
denga/AVQ
derano/AVQ
dhabha/AVQ
dhambha/AVQ
dhefa/AVQ
dhimuka/AVQ
dhisimisa/AVQ
dhonhera/AVQ
dhumanisa/AVQ
dhuvhura/AVQ
dimbura/AVQ
dishuka/AVQ
dokwaira/AVQ
donora/AVQ
dudunuka/AVQ
dumbukidza/AVQ
durikidza/AVQ
dyarisa/AVQ
dzadzama/AVQ
dzambanuka/AVQ
dzedura/AVQ
dzidzimuka/AVQ
dzikinyidza/AVQ
dzimikira/AVQ
dzipana/AVQ
dzivura/AVQ
dzokororesa/AVQ
dzorora/AVQ
dzungudzira/AVQ
dzvamuka/AVQ
dzvinyira/AVQ
dzvova/AVQ
ekera/AVQ
enderera/AVQ
ereketa/AVQ
fadhamuka/AVQ
fambika/AVQ
fanyana/AVQ
farura/AVQ
fefedza/AVQ
fekura/AVQ
fenda/AVQ
fera/AVQ
fetuka/AVQ
finhudza/AVQ
firudha/AVQ
fokoterwa/AVQ
fonon'ona/AVQ
foshoresa/AVQ
fudiga/AVQ
fufunura/AVQ
fuka/AVQ
fukunyuka/AVQ
fumhurudza/AVQ
fundumwara/AVQ
fungira/AVQ
funzura/AVQ
furikidza/AVQ
fusa/AVQ
futunura/AVQ
fuzuka/AVQ
gadyaira/AVQ
gagadura/AVQ
gan'a/AVQ
ganura/AVQ
gashidza/AVQ
gemuka/AVQ
giya/AVQ
gogodzera/AVQ
gomera/AVQ
gongorodza/AVQ
goverana/AVQ
guduka/AVQ
gukuchira/AVQ
gumbukira/AVQ
gumudza/AVQ
guraudza/AVQ
gurura/AVQ
guuna/AVQ
gwadamisa/AVQ
gwanha/AVQ
gwebedeka/AVQ
gwegwedura/AVQ
gwibuka/AVQ
hafuka/AVQ
hayisa/AVQ
homa/AVQ
hurududuka/AVQ
hwarara/AVQ
hwihwinyika/AVQ
iga/AVQ
ipisa/AVQ
izana/AVQ
jakanya/AVQ
jegeja/AVQ
jichidza/AVQ
joka/AVQ
jurura/AVQ
kahadzisa/AVQ
kakaradza/AVQ
kakavadzana/AVQ
kana/AVQ
kangaidza/AVQ
kanyudza/AVQ
karutsa/AVQ
kavavika/AVQ
kirosha/AVQ
kodzera/AVQ
kombaira/AVQ
kona/AVQ
konja/AVQ
korongonya/AVQ
kotsirisa/AVQ
kuhunika/AVQ
kumisa/AVQ
kupe/AVQ
kusvumidza/AVQ
kwabuka/AVQ
kwanga/AVQ
kwatanuka/AVQ
kwenezva/AVQ
kweyera/AVQ
macha/AVQ
manzura/AVQ
mbomboveresa/AVQ
meedza/AVQ
mheuka/AVQ
mita/AVQ
motsoka/AVQ
mvonyera/AVQ
mwekerera/AVQ
nakisisa/AVQ
nanganidza/AVQ
ndadzura/AVQ
ndiriridza/AVQ
nema/AVQ
ngandudza/AVQ
ngondomoka/AVQ
nguvaira/AVQ
ngwinyura/AVQ
nhutsa/AVQ
njandangudza/AVQ
njodogodza/AVQ
noza/AVQ
nyaidza/AVQ
nyangatira/AVQ
nyauka/AVQ
nyepa/AVQ
nyimbirika/AVQ
nyongodeka/AVQ
nyunyuridza/AVQ
nzvenda-nzvenda/AVQ
okera/AVQ
onorora/AVQ
pafamadza/AVQ
pambamura/AVQ
pandukira/AVQ
papatisa/AVQ
pashamara/AVQ
pazira/AVQ
penga/AVQ
pererera/AVQ
pfachanguka/AVQ
pfekedza/AVQ
pfira/AVQ
pfudiga/AVQ
pfumbata/AVQ
pfungaira/AVQ
pfuruka/AVQ
pigaira/AVQ
pindura/AVQ
pipitika/AVQ
piya/AVQ
ponga/AVQ
poyera/AVQ
pumurisa/AVQ
pupurutsa/AVQ
putsa/AVQ
pweshukira/AVQ
ragada/AVQ
randera/AVQ
rashuka/AVQ
redzva/AVQ
remekedzeka/AVQ
revha/AVQ
rimbura/AVQ
rivara/AVQ
ropafadza/AVQ
royonora/AVQ
rundumwara/AVQ
rwira/AVQ
sakatira/AVQ
sarisa/AVQ
sekera/AVQ
serenuka/AVQ
shakura/AVQ
shanyarika/AVQ
shayiwa/AVQ
shinhwa/AVQ
shomeka/AVQ
shovedza/AVQ
shushira/AVQ
sikira/AVQ
sisidza/AVQ
sonhomoka/AVQ
sumuka/AVQ
sunyaira/AVQ
svadanga/AVQ
svepuka/AVQ
svinyanga/AVQ
svonga/AVQ
svusvudzira/AVQ
tabvuka/AVQ
takurira/AVQ
tananguka/AVQ
tanhura/AVQ
tararika/AVQ
tatapura/AVQ
tedza/AVQ
teketesa/AVQ
tendeuka/AVQ
tepudza/AVQ
tetereka/AVQ
tiga/AVQ
tinhidza/AVQ
tizisa/AVQ
tongesa/AVQ
tsa/AVQ
tsara/AVQ
tsema/AVQ
tsigidura/AVQ
tsindinura/AVQ
tsivira/AVQ
tsotsota/AVQ
tsunzunya/AVQ
tsvara/AVQ
tsvetsva/AVQ
tsvudumuka/AVQ
tudzunura/AVQ
tuna/AVQ
tupfunyuka/AVQ
tutunura/AVQ
tyaka/AVQ
umbidzira/AVQ
unisa/AVQ
va/AVQ
vanza/AVQ
vedzesa/AVQ
vhakacha/AVQ
vhengeza/AVQ
vhiringidza/AVQ
vhumbura/AVQ
vhurumira/AVQ
virima/AVQ
wadzana/AVQ
warukira/AVQ
wodzvoka/AVQ
wuwura/AVQ
yemedzeka/AVQ
zadzisa/AVQ
zendema/AVQ
zhazha/AVQ
zingizira/AVQ
zungaidza/AVQ
zvarisa/AVQ
zvinzwa/AVQ
